tests/cases.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../kum.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../kum.automorf.hfst

Tests:
  "[twol] Front-vowel words":
    тарих<n><nom> : тарих
    тарих<n><acc> : тарихни
    тарих<n><gen> : тарихни
    тарих<n><dat> : тарихге
    тарих<n><loc> : тарихде
    тарих<n><abl> : тарихден

  "[twol] Back vowel words":
    йыл<n><nom> : йыл
    йыл<n><acc> : йылны
    йыл<n><gen> : йылны
    йыл<n><dat> : йылгъа
    йыл<n><loc> : йылда
    йыл<n><abl> : йылдан

  "[twol] Front-rounded vowel words":
    оьмюр<n><nom> : оьмюр
    оьмюр<n><acc> : оьмюрню
    оьмюр<n><gen> : оьмюрню
    оьмюр<n><dat> : оьмюрге
    оьмюр<n><loc> : оьмюрде
    оьмюр<n><abl> : оьмюрден
    оьмюр<n><loc><attr> : оьмюрдеги

  "[twol] px3sp Front-vowel words":
    тарих<n><px3sp><nom> : тарихи
    тарих<n><px3sp><acc> : тарихин
    тарих<n><px3sp><gen> : тарихини
    тарих<n><px3sp><dat> : тарихине
    тарих<n><px3sp><loc> : тарихинде
    тарих<n><px3sp><abl> : тарихинден

  "[twol] px3sp Back vowel words":
    йыл<n><px3sp><nom> : йылы
    йыл<n><px3sp><acc> : йылын
    йыл<n><px3sp><gen> : йылыны
    йыл<n><px3sp><dat> : йылына
    йыл<n><px3sp><loc> : йылында
    йыл<n><px3sp><abl> : йылындан

  "[twol] Front-rounded vowel words":
    оьмюр<n><px3sp><nom> : оьмюр
    оьмюр<n><px3sp><acc> : оьмюрюн
    оьмюр<n><px3sp><gen> : оьмюрюню
    оьмюр<n><px3sp><dat> : оьмюрюне
    оьмюр<n><px3sp><loc> : оьмюрюнде
    оьмюр<n><px3sp><abl> : оьмюрюнден
    оьмюр<n><px3sp><loc><attr> : оьмюрюндеги
